Louisiana, session 2026, HB546.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 28:53(L)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§53. Admission by emergency certificate; extension; payment for services rendered
* * *
L.(1)(a) A peace officer or a peace officer accompanied by an emergency
medical service trained technician may take a person into protective custody and
transport him to a treatment facility for a medical evaluation when, as a result of his
personal observation, if the peace officer or emergency medical service technician
has reasonable grounds reason to believe both of the following: the person is a proper
subject for involuntary admission to a treatment facility because the person is acting
in a manner dangerous to himself or dangerous to others, is gravely disabled, and is
in need of immediate hospitalization to protect such a person or others from physical
harm. The person may be transported only to a treatment facility as defined in R.S.
28:2.
(i) The person is a danger to himself, a danger to others, or gravely disabled.
(ii) There is a substantial risk of serious harm to the person or others unless
the person is taken into protective custody immediately.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 546 ENROLLED
(b) A peace officer or peace officer accompanied by an emergency medical
service trained technician shall form the belief that a person meets the criteria for
immediate protective custody based on his observation of the person or a statement
from a third party believed to offer credible information relevant to Subparagraph
(a) of this Paragraph.
(c) A peace officer shall act in accordance with the provisions of this Section
and in accordance with any existing departmental practices or procedures.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.